test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_vaso_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - vašo: # MLO corrected
    vašo+N+Sg+Nom:  vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Gen:  vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Acc:  vašo
    vašo+N+Sg+Ill:  vašon
    vašo+N+Sg+Loc:  vaašoost
    vašo+N+Sg+Com:  vašoin
    vašo+N+Sg+Abe:  vašottáá
    vašo+N+Ess:  vaššoon
    vašo+N+Par: vaššood
    vašo+N+Pl+Nom:  vašoh
    vašo+N+Pl+Gen:  vašoi
    vašo+N+Pl+Acc:  vašoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Ill:  vašoid
    vašo+N+Pl+Loc:  vašoin
    vašo+N+Pl+Com:  [vašoiguin, vašoigijn]
    vašo+N+Pl+Abe:  vašoittáá
